Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-706.04
Federal regulations adopted; inconsistency; how treated; filing required.

(1) The Legislature hereby adopts by reference 9 C.F.R. part 77, except requirements relating to captive cervids, and the Bovine Tuberculosis Eradication Uniform Methods and Rules published by APHIS in effect on February 15, 2007, as part of the Bovine Tuberculosis Act. If there is an inconsistency between such federal regulations and the Bovine Tuberculosis Act or between such Uniform Methods and Rules and the Bovine Tuberculosis Act, the requirements of the Bovine Tuberculosis Act shall control. If there is an inconsistency between such federal regulations and the Uniform Methods and Rules, the requirements of the federal regulations shall control, except in the definition of livestock where the definition in the Uniform Methods and Rules shall control.

(2) Certified copies of the portion of the federal regulations and the rules adopted by reference pursuant to this section shall be filed in the offices of the Secretary of State, Clerk of the Legislature, and department.

Laws 2007, LB110, § 4.